Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 1 General Provisions
38-6-110. Central registry for sexual offenders.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall establish a central registry of sexual offenders modeled after statutes enacted in other states. The registry shall include all validated offenders from files maintained by the department of children's services, all persons who have been arrested for the commission of a sexual offense, and all persons who have been convicted of a sexual offense.

The departments of correction and children's services and local law enforcement agencies shall cooperate fully in the creation and updating of the central registry.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 36; 1989, ch. 278, § 45; 1996, ch. 1079, § 122.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of certain duties from the department of human services to the department of health, see Executive Order No. 6 (January 12, 1996).

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Sexual offender registration and monitoring, title 40, ch. 39, part 2.

Tennessee serious and violent sexual offender monitoring, title 40, ch. 39, part 3.

Law Reviews.

Let's Talk About Sexting, Baby: A Mens Rea-Centered Approach to the Sexting Issue in Tennessee (Emily Long), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1139 (2012).

38-6-111. Disposal of gambling devices.

Any gambling device confiscated by the Tennessee bureau of investigation pursuant to a lawful order that has become final, including appeals, may, in lieu of destruction, be ordered sold at public sale, after the removal and destruction of the gambling circuitry and mechanisms. The proceeds of sales shall be deposited with the Tennessee bureau of investigation and budgeted to procure equipment for the forensic services division of the bureau.

Acts 1987, ch. 450, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 19.

Cross-References. Gambling, title 39, ch. 17, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. “Gambling device” construed to include gambling software, OAG 98-0173 (8/28/98).

38-6-112. Requests by attorney general and reporter for assistance.

The attorney general and reporter is authorized to request the director of the bureau to furnish any assistance that may be required by the attorney general and reporter in the performance of the attorney general and reporter's duties under title 8, chapter 47, regarding the removal of officers; title 47, chapter 25, part 1, regarding trusts-unlawful restraint of trade and discrimination; §§ 48-1-122 and 48-1-123, regarding violations of the Tennessee Securities Act of 1980; and title 47, chapter 18, part 1, regarding the Consumer Protection Act of 1977. The bureau is authorized to provide to the attorney general and reporter any assistance that the attorney general and reporter may request pursuant to this section.

Acts 1990, ch. 976, § 1.

Cross-References. Duties of attorney general and reporter, §§ 2-10-109, 3-6-103.

Legal department, title 4, ch. 3, part 15.

38-6-113. DNA analysis — Procedures for collection and preservation of human biological specimens.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “DNA analysis” means the process through which deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) in a human biological specimen is analyzed and compared with DNA from another biological specimen for identification purposes.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall develop uniform procedures for the collection and preservation of human biological specimens for DNA analysis in cases of alleged or suspected violations of § 39-13-502, § 39-13-503, § 39-13-504, § 39-13-505, § 39-13-522 or § 39-15-302. Law enforcement agencies and medical personnel who conduct evidentiary examinations shall use the uniform procedures in their investigation of the above offenses.

The bureau shall adopt uniform procedures to maintain, preserve and analyze human biological specimens for DNA. The bureau shall establish a centralized system to cross-reference data obtained from DNA analysis. The centralized system shall contain convicted felon profiles, forensic unknown profiles, criminal suspect profiles, violent juvenile sexual offender profiles, and missing person profiles. The detention, arrest or conviction of a person based upon a databank match or database information is not invalidated, if it is later determined that the specimens or samples were obtained or placed in the database by mistake.

For purposes of this subsection (c), “violent juvenile sexual offender” means any person adjudicated delinquent for any act that if committed by an adult would constitute a violation of § 39-13-502, § 39-13-503, § 39-13-504, § 39-13-505, § 39-13-522, § 39-13-531 or § 39-15-302.

The bureau shall perform DNA analysis and make data obtained available to law enforcement officials in connection with appropriate criminal investigations in which human biological specimens have been recovered. The bureau shall also make the data available to the district attorney general, and the subject of the data in any subsequent criminal prosecution of the subject.

Acts 1991, ch. 480, § 1; 1995, ch. 131, § 1; 2006, ch. 723, § 1; 2010, ch. 964, § 1.

Cross-References. Biological specimens for DNA analysis, persons convicted of certain offenses, § 40-35-321.

DNA analysis, admissibility in evidence, § 24-7-118.

Post-conviction DNA Analysis Act of 2001, title 40, ch. 30, part 3.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and operation of state DNA database statutes. 76 A.L.R.5th 239.

38-6-114. Course of instruction concerning
human trafficking.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall, by January 1, 2016:

Implement a course or courses of instruction, composed of live instruction, telecommunication, video or other medium, or any combination of methods, for the training of law enforcement officers and other government officials who are directly involved with human trafficking, including the investigation of and the intake of human trafficking complaints; and

Develop recommended best practice uniform protocols and procedures for law enforcement response to human trafficking.

The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall emphasize:

The dynamics and manifestations of human trafficking;

Identifying and communicating with victims;

Providing documentation that satisfies the peace officers standards and training (POST) commission requirements;

Collaboration with federal law enforcement officials;

Appropriate investigative techniques for the particular victim or victim type;

The availability of civil and immigration remedies and community resources; and

Protection of the victim.

Where appropriate, the trainers shall include presentations by human trafficking experts with experience in the delivery of direct services to victims of human trafficking.

Completion of the course may be satisfied by telecommunication, video recording, or other instruction presentation method where an instructor on site is not required.

A law enforcement officer who is assigned field or investigative duties shall complete a minimum of two (2) hours of training in a course or courses of instruction pertaining to the handling of human trafficking complaints as described in subsection (b).

An officer must complete the training hours required by subdivision (c)(1) by July 1, 2017, or within six (6) months from the officer's date of employment as a full-time law enforcement officer, whichever is later.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall employ four (4) additional persons qualified to serve as special agents whose duties it will be to provide training pursuant to this section, investigate, and develop criminal cases involving human trafficking offenses throughout the state.

Once the additional special agents are employed, they shall be assigned so that all regions of the state are equally represented.

In addition to the course of instruction provided to law enforcement officers pursuant to subsection (a), the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall develop and deliver a course of instruction designed for various agencies and departments likely to come into contact with human trafficking and human trafficking victims during the course of delivering services. Departments, agencies, or associations included in this course of instruction are:

Council of juvenile and family court judges, including juvenile court administrators, juvenile court youth services officers, and juvenile court probation officers;

Department of children's services;

Department of education;

Department of health;

Department of human services;

Department of mental health and substance abuse services;

Department of safety;

Department of labor and workforce development;

District attorneys general conference;

District public defenders conference;

Office of the attorney general and reporter;

Tennessee association of chiefs of police;

[Deleted by 2017 amendment.]

Tennessee sheriffs' association;

Tennessee judicial conference;

Tennessee general sessions judges conference; and

Clerks of court conference.

In developing the course of instruction pursuant to this subsection (e), the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall consult with the human trafficking task force or individual members of the task force.

Furnishing personnel and appropriations for the training course is the sole responsibility of the Tennessee bureau of investigation. Departments, agencies, or associations included under subsection (e) shall be provided the training at no cost to the department, agency, or association.

Acts 2015, ch. 503, § 1; 2016, ch. 979, §§ 2, 3; 2017, ch. 326, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 38-6-114 (Acts 1993, ch. 350, § 4; 1995, ch. 325, § 2; 1997, ch. 232, § 2; 1997, ch. 305, § 2; 2000, ch. 947, § 8K; 2000, ch. 981, § 51), concerning fingerprint analysis for local boards and organizations, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 16, effective July 1, 2000. For present law, see § 38-6-109.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (e)(1), added “, including juvenile court administrators, juvenile court youth services officers, and juvenile court probation officers” at the end of (A), and added (O)-(Q).

The 2017 amendment deleted former (e)(1)(M) which read “Tennessee economic council on women;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 503, § 3. July 1, 2015.

Act 2016, ch. 979, § 5. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 6. July 1, 2017.

38-6-115. Notification of the district attorney general.

If the bureau is investigating the possible commission of any offense specified in § 38-6-102(b), the bureau may, but is not required to, notify the district attorney general where the investigation is being conducted of the investigation.

Acts 1995, ch. 469, § 2.

38-6-116. Tennessee internet criminal information center.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall create an office within the bureau to be known as the Tennessee internet criminal information center (TICIC). The purpose of the center is the development, maintenance and updating of an online database, toll-free hotline and such other means as are appropriate to provide easily accessible information to members of the public concerning persons of interest to the public safety and welfare.

Upon creation of the TICIC, the bureau shall compile and maintain databases consisting of a registry and associated information for the following groups of persons:

The Sexual Offense Registry.

This registry shall consist of all public information regarding persons who are required to complete a TBI sexual offender registration/monitoring form pursuant to title 40, chapter 39, part 2;

This registry shall include the photograph of all persons who are registered pursuant to title 40, chapter 39, part 2;

The Tennessee Missing Children Registry. This registry shall consist of those children who have been placed by the bureau on the Tennessee missing children registry; and

Any other registry, information or database that, in the opinion of the bureau, would be in the interest of the public safety or welfare.

When one (1) or more of the databases comprising the TICIC is complete and in an accessible format, the bureau shall place and maintain each of them on the TICIC's Internet home page which shall be accessible through the state of Tennessee's Internet home page.

Acts 1997, ch. 341, § 1; 2011, ch. 263, § 1; 2011, ch. 268, § 1; 2012, ch. 727, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The toll-free hotline referred to in (a) can be reached at 1-888-837-4170.

The URL for the state of Tennessee is http://www.state.tn.us.

The URL of the web site for the TICIC is http://www.ticic.state.tn.us.

For the preamble to the act concerning transfers of certain functions relating to probation and parole services and the community correction grant program from the board of probation and parole to the department of correction, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 727.

38-6-117. Missing children registry.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation is authorized to create within the bureau a missing children registry. The registry shall contain pertinent information about, a picture of, and the current status of certain children in this state who have been reported missing.

The bureau shall have the sole discretion to determine the number of missing children to be placed on the registry, the criteria for placing a child on the registry and the definition of “missing child.”

The bureau shall place, maintain and update the missing children registry on the state of Tennessee's internet home page.

When the Tennessee internet criminal information center is created within the bureau and becomes operational, the missing children registry shall become a part of such center.

The bureau shall update the missing children's web page to reflect that a missing child has been recovered.

Acts 1997, ch. 342, § 1; 2014, ch. 588, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The URL for the state of Tennessee is http://www.state.tn.us.

The URL of the web site for the TICIC is http://www.ticic.state.tn.us.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 588, § 2. July 1, 2014.

38-6-118. Expunged criminal offender and pretrial diversion database.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall establish within the bureau an expunged criminal offender and pretrial diversion database. Such database shall consist of the name, date of birth, social security number, charging offense, date of dismissal and date of expunction of a criminal offender who has:

Been granted diversion either under title 40, chapter 15 or § 40-35-313; provided, however, that the bureau shall not be required to enter or maintain information into its database concerning any dismissal or expunction order dated on or after July 1, 1999, if the charge dismissed or expunged is classified as a Class B or C misdemeanor;

Had the public records of such offense expunged following the dismissal of charges against the offender by reason of the successful completion of either the diversion program; or

Had the public records of such offense expunged following the dismissal of charges for any other reason.

The bureau shall obtain the information for the database from the abstracts or copies of orders sent to it by judges pursuant to §§ 40-15-105, 40-32-101 and 40-35-313. The bureau shall also obtain information for the database from its confidential records maintained for law enforcement purposes, the public portion of which were expunged prior to October 1, 1998.

When a judge or district attorney general requests a certificate from the bureau relative to a defendant's eligibility for pretrial diversion pursuant to title 40, chapter 15 or § 40-35-313, the bureau shall conduct a criminal history record check based upon the defendant's name, date of birth and social security number to determine if the defendant:

Has a prior felony or Class A misdemeanor conviction;

Has ever previously been granted a type of diversion; and

Has ever had an order expunging the public records of a criminal offense following the dismissal of charges entered on behalf of such defendant.

The bureau shall certify the results of such search to the requesting judge or district attorney general. The bureau shall not be required to search any other source or database in order to make the certification required by this section.

Funding for the operational expenses of this section shall be as stated under § 40-32-101(d)(2) [repealed].

Except for the purpose of certifying to judges and district attorneys general the information required in subsection (b), the expunged criminal offender and pretrial diversion database created by this section is not a public record and shall be maintained as confidential by the bureau; provided, however, that the bureau shall forward all information on expunction orders to the administrative office of the courts for the sole purpose of ensuring the expunction of records from the databases maintained pursuant to §§ 16-1-117 and 16-3-803(i).

Upon a defendant's request for diversion pursuant to title 40, chapter 15, or § 40-35-313, all of which require a certificate from the bureau relative to the defendant's eligibility for diversion, the defendant shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to the bureau for remittance to the state treasury to be deposited in the general fund of the state.

Acts 1998, ch. 1099, § 11; 2000, ch. 645, § 4; 2002, ch. 495, § 5; 2004, ch. 484, § 1; 2012, ch. 1041, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 668, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 40-32-101(d)(2), referred to in subsection (c), was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 200, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “remittance to the state treasury to be deposited in the general fund of the state” for “deposit in the special fund established in § 40-32-101(d) and shall be used by the bureau for the purposes specified under § 40-32-101(d)” at the end of (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 668, § 6. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Penalties for Class A, B and C misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

38-6-119. Protection and security for facilities, employees, and grounds — Powers — Instruction.

The director shall have authority to commission Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) uniformed officers in order to protect and provide security for TBI facilities, employees, and grounds.

Such uniformed officers shall have full power to carry firearms and make arrests for any offenses under the laws of the state of Tennessee.

All TBI uniformed officers must successfully complete a prescribed basic law enforcement course of instruction at the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy or its equivalent.

Acts 2002, ch. 519, § 1.

Cross-References. Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy, title 38, ch. 8, part 2.

38-6-120. Criminal history information compiled from intrastate sources — Fees.

Criminal history information compiled by the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) from intrastate sources shall be available on a priority basis to criminal justice agencies for criminal justice purposes free of charge. After providing the TBI with all known identifying information, persons in the private sector and noncriminal justice agencies may be provided criminal history information upon tender of fees as established in subsection (b), and in the manner prescribed by rule of the TBI. Such fees are to offset expenditures related to operational costs of the TBI. Any access to criminal history information by the private sector or noncriminal justice agencies as provided in this subsection (a) shall be assessed without regard to the quantity or category of criminal history record information requested. Fees may be reduced by the director of the TBI for good cause shown.

The fee per record for criminal history information provided pursuant to this section is twenty-nine dollars ($29.00) per name submitted.

Acts 2004, ch. 552, § 1.

38-6-121. Care Alert program.

The general assembly finds that in the case of a missing citizen who has wandered due to dementia, physical impairment, or disability, the first few hours are critical in finding the citizen. To aid in the identification and location of missing citizens, there is created the Care Alert program. This program shall be coordinated by local law enforcement agencies which may choose to seek the assistance of nonprofit organizations such as A Child is Missing, the Alzheimer's Association, or Alzheimer's Tennessee. Local law enforcement agencies are encouraged to develop area-specific protocols for implementation of this program. The Tennessee bureau of investigation is encouraged to develop an appropriate card patterned after the first two (2) sections of the Amber Alert Activation Card but addressing the situation of missing citizens who have wandered due to dementia or physical impairment. This card, if produced, would be distributed to appropriate law enforcement personnel; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection (a) shall be deemed to mandate the development, production, and distribution of the card.

For the purpose of this section, “missing citizen” means:

A person whose age at the time the person is first reported missing is sixty (60) years of age or older, whose whereabouts are unknown and who is believed to be in danger because of age, health, mental health conditions, or physical disability, in combination with environmental or weather conditions, or is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance;

A person of any age who suffers from a documented case of dementia; whose whereabouts are unknown; who is believed to be in danger because of the dementia or physical impairment; and is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance; or

A person whose age at the time the person is first reported missing is eighteen (18) years of age or older; whose whereabouts are unknown; who has an intellectual, developmental, or physical disability; and who is believed to be in danger because of the disability, or is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance.

When a local law enforcement agency receives notice that a citizen with a condition described in subdivision (b)(1) is missing and has received a caregiver's statement verifying the condition of the missing citizen, or, when the local law enforcement agency receives notice that a citizen with a condition described in subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) is missing and has received medical documentation of that citizen's dementia, physical impairment, or disability, the agency is urged to begin an investigation immediately.

Local law enforcement shall enter the report of the missing citizen with a physical impairment, dementia, physical disability, intellectual disability, or mental health condition into the national crime information center (NCIC) within four (4) hours of the completion of the verification process.

The alert shall be sent to media outlets in this state at the discretion of the local law enforcement agency. Media outlets shall be strongly encouraged to publicize the information provided in order to promote the safe recovery of the missing citizen. When the alert is sent to media outlets, it shall contain all appropriate information from the local law enforcement agency that may assist in the safe recovery of the missing citizen and a statement instructing anyone with information related to the missing citizen to contact their local law enforcement agency. The alert shall contain all appropriate, descriptive information available, including, but not limited to, the location last seen, vehicle information, clothing worn, and photo, if available, that may assist in the safe recovery of the endangered missing person.

Additional local resources that can be utilized, including, but not limited to, reserve units, emergency service units, air support, K-9 units, or automated phone dialer capabilities, shall be identified and maintained as part of the local law enforcement agency's program. Local law enforcement agencies are strongly encouraged to collaborate with surrounding law enforcement agencies to identify additional resources available that will help aid in the safe recovery of endangered missing persons. Local law enforcement agencies may choose to seek the assistance of nonprofit organizations including, but not limited to, A Child is Missing, the Alzheimer's Association, Alzheimer's Tennessee, or the Center for Human Identification.

The alert shall be cancelled by the local law enforcement agency upon notification that the missing citizen has been found, including cancellation of the missing person entry into NCIC.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to deter a law enforcement agency from seeking to find any missing individual as set out by its own policies and procedures.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation, the Tennessee Sheriffs' Association and the Tennessee Association of Chiefs of Police are encouraged to educate law enforcement as to the requirements of the Care Alert program by methods including, but not limited to: newsletters, press releases, media relations, access to TBI's current media list and educational instruction through the Tennessee law enforcement training academy.

Acts 2009, ch. 590, § 1; 2010, ch. 733, § 1; 2016, ch. 682, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 972, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment by ch. 682 substituted “Care Alert program” for “missing citizen alert program” at the end of the second sentence of (a) and near the middle of (d); substituted “dementia, physical impairment, or disability” for “dementia or physical impairment” in the first sentence of (a) and near the end of (c)(1); rewrote (b) which read, “(b) For the purpose of this section, ‘missing citizen’ means a person:“(1) Whose whereabouts are unknown;“(2) Whose age at the time the person is first reported missing is sixty (60) years of age or older and who has an impaired mental condition as determined by a local law enforcement agency; and“(3) Who is believed to be in danger because of age, health, mental or physical disability, in combination with environmental or weather conditions, or is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance; or“(4) A person of any age who suffers from a documented case of dementia, whose whereabouts are unknown, and who is believed to be in danger because of the dementia or physical impairment, and is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance.”; in (c)(1), substituted “subdivision (b)(1)” for “subdivisions (b)(1)-(3)” near the beginning and substituted “subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3)” for “subdivision (b)(4)” near the middle; and substituted “a physical impairment, dementia, physical disability, intellectual disability, or mental health condition” for “an impaired mental condition or physical impairment” in (c)(2).

The 2016 amendment by ch. 972, in (a), substituted “nonprofit organizations such as A Child is Missing, the Alzheimer's Association, or Alzheimer's Tennessee” for “nonprofit organizations such as A Child is Missing or the Alzheimer's Association” at the end of the third sentence, and added the last two sentences; and inserted “, Alzheimer's Tennessee,” in the last sentence of (c)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 682, § 6. March 24, 2016.

Act 2016, ch. 972, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Programs and services for elderly persons, title 71, ch. 2.

38-6-122. Blue Alert system.

There is established within the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) the Blue Alert system. The purpose of the Blue Alert system is to provide a statewide system for the rapid dissemination of information to speed the apprehension of violent criminals who kill or seriously injure law enforcement officers and to aid in the location of missing law enforcement officers.

If the TBI receives a report that involves the death or serious injury of a law enforcement officer in which the suspect has not been apprehended or involves a law enforcement officer missing while in the line of duty under circumstances warranting concern for such law enforcement officer's safety, the TBI shall issue an alert providing for rapid dissemination of information statewide regarding such suspect or law enforcement officer, as appropriate. The TBI shall make every effort to disseminate the information as quickly as possible when the status of the suspect or missing law enforcement officer has been reported to a law enforcement agency.

The TBI shall adopt uniform guidelines and procedures for issuing an alert for such persons and shall provide education and training to encourage radio and television broadcasters to participate in the alert. The guidelines and procedures shall ensure that specific health information about any suspect or law enforcement officer is not made public through the alert or otherwise.

The TBI shall consult with the department of transportation and develop a procedure for the use of overhead permanent changeable message signs to provide information on a missing suspect or law enforcement officer meeting the criteria of this section when information is available that would enable motorists to assist in the recovery of the missing person. The TBI and the department of transportation shall develop guidelines for the content, length, and frequency of any message to be placed on an overhead permanent changeable message sign.

The TBI may use the statewide infrastructure of the America's Missing Broadcast Emergency Response (AMBER) Alert to the extent permissible to facilitate the Blue Alert system.

Any entity or individual involved in the dissemination of a Blue Alert generated pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages arising from such dissemination.

Acts 2011, ch. 190, § 1.

38-6-123. Inventory of sexual assault collection kits.

As used in this section:

“Forensic medical examination” means an examination provided to the victim of a sexually-oriented criminal offense by a healthcare provider for the purpose of gathering and preserving evidence of a sexual assault for use in a court of law;

“Sexual assault collection kit” means a human biological specimen or specimens collected by a healthcare provider during a forensic medical examination from the victim of a sexually-oriented criminal offense; and

“Untested sexual assault collection kit” means a sexual assault collection kit that has not been submitted to the Tennessee bureau of investigation or a similar qualified laboratory for either a serology or deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test.

By July 1, 2014, all law enforcement agencies and departments charged with the maintenance, storage and preservation of sexual assault collection kits shall conduct an inventory of all such kits being stored by the agency or department.

By July 1, 2014, each law enforcement agency shall compile, in writing, a report containing the number of untested sexual assault collection kits in the possession of the agency or department and the date the sexual assault kit was collected. The report shall be transmitted to the Tennessee bureau of investigation.

By September 1, 2014, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall prepare and transmit a report to the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives containing the number of untested sexual assault collection kits being stored by each county, by each law enforcement agency or department, and the date the untested kit was collected.

Acts 2014, ch. 733, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 856, § 1 purported to enact § 38-6-123. Section 38-6-123 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 733, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 856, § 1 was designated as § 38-6-124 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 733 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 733, § 2. April 21, 2014. [See the Compiler’s Notes.]

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

38-6-124. Survey requesting information on best method for interfacing multiple computer databases to allow accessibility by patrolling police officers.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall, with the assistance of the Tennessee association of chiefs of police, the Tennessee sheriffs' association and the county officials association of Tennessee, survey appropriate law enforcement agencies and clerks' offices for the specific purpose of requesting information as to the best method for interfacing multiple computer databases to allow accessibility by police officers while on patrol, thereby allowing officers when making a lawful stop to also serve outstanding court papers such as warrants, unserved civil process, orders of protection and restraining orders. On or before January 1, 2015, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall submit the results of the survey to the judiciary committee of the senate and the civil and criminal justice committees of the house of representatives.

Acts 2014, ch. 856, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 856, § 1 purported to enact § 38-6-123. Section 38-6-123 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 733, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 856, § 1 was designated as § 38-6-124 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 856 took effect on April 29, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 856, § 2. April 29, 2014. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

38-6-125. Help Find the Missing Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Help Find the Missing Act”.

As used in this section:

“Missing citizen” has the same meaning as defined in § 38-6-121;

“Regional forensic center” means a facility accredited by the National Association of Medical Examiners at which autopsies are performed pursuant to § 38-7-105; and

“Unidentified body” means human remains which are unidentified after all available methods have been exhausted.

In all cases in which the county medical examiner is not satisfied with the decedent's identification the body shall be referred for examination to a regional forensic center.

The regional forensic center shall furnish the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) and the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System created by the United States department of justice's national institute of justice (NamUs), if physically possible, with copies of fingerprints on standardized eight inch by eight inch (8" x 8") fingerprint cards or the equivalent digital image; prints or partial prints of any fingers; any forensic odontology report concerning the body; detailed personal descriptions; DNA results; and all other identifying data, including date and place of death, of all deceased persons whose deaths are in a classification requiring inquiry by the medical examiner and who remain unidentified after all available methods have been exhausted.

When any person makes a report of a missing person to a law enforcement agency, the agency shall immediately request a member of the family or next of kin of the missing person to authorize the release to local law enforcement of the dental records of the person reported missing. If the person reported missing is still missing thirty (30) days after the report is made, the law enforcement agency shall deliver the release to the dentist or dentists of the missing person, and request the dentist or dentists to deliver such records, including dental x-rays, to the local law enforcement agency.

If the person reported missing has not been found within the first thirty (30) days and no family or next of kin exists or can be located, the law enforcement agency may execute a written declaration, stating that an active investigation seeking the location of the missing person is being conducted and that the dental records are necessary for the exclusive purpose of furthering the investigation. Such written declaration, signed by a law enforcement officer, is sufficient authority for the dentist or dentists to release the missing person's dental records, including dental x-rays, to the local law enforcement agency, and shall not be the basis for disciplinary action pursuant to § 63-5-124. Upon receipt of a properly executed release and request or declaration, the dentist or dentists shall forward the dental records, including dental x-rays, to local law enforcement, where a file shall be maintained concerning persons reported as missing and who have not been reported as found. Within ten (10) days of receipt, a copy of the dental records, including x-rays, shall be forwarded to NamUS by the local law enforcement agency or the TBI.

Whenever a law enforcement agency determines that a person is a missing citizen, or that an unidentified living person may be a missing citizen, such law enforcement agency shall enter the report of such missing citizen in any database of missing persons currently required by their agency, into any missing person database utilized by the TBI and into NamUs.

If the TBI receives the report of a missing citizen, the TBI shall maintain a record of the case file. The TBI shall promulgate rules relating to the dissemination of the records. The rules shall require that, pursuant to this subsection (f), the process of releasing the records shall take no longer than forty-eight (48) hours from the time the TBI receives a report that a citizen, for whom there is a previous record, is missing. The record may be disseminated if the individual to whom the record pertains is reported missing on a subsequent occasion or if needed for evidentiary purposes in any civil litigation against the TBI or its personnel that arises from the investigation. In the event that there are grounds for a criminal action arising from the investigation, nothing in this subsection (f) shall prohibit the TBI from allowing the records to remain until criminal action is concluded or otherwise resolved.

The information contained in the TBI's missing person files shall be made available to NamUs and to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate missing persons.

No law enforcement agency shall establish or maintain any policy which requires the observance of a waiting period before accepting and investigating a missing child report. Upon receipt of a report of a missing child, a law enforcement agency shall enter the child into the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) pursuant to federal bureau of investigation mandate, which is two (2) hours from the time the child is reported missing to law enforcement.

When a person previously reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief of police, medical examiner, regional forensic center, or other law enforcement agency shall report to the TBI and to NamUs within twenty-four (24) hours that the person has been found.

Nothing in this section prohibits law enforcement agencies or regional forensic centers from maintaining case files related to missing citizens or unidentified bodies.

Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of the regional forensic center to obtain dental records, including charts and x-rays in cases in which these records are necessary for the identification of human remains as authorized in § 38-7-117.

Acts 2017, ch. 239, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 239, § 2. July 1, 2017.